Massachusetts, session 194th, H2821.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 100 of Chapter 32 of Massachusetts General Laws is amended by adding at the
end the following paragraph:-
Effective January 1, 2023, social workers at the Department of Children and Families
shall be eligible for this benefit. The Massachusetts State Board of Retirement shall promulgate
regulations under which conditions a DCF social worker can be eligible.
of 1